Illinois, session 104th, HB3249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Right 5to Sit at Work Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Department" means the Department of Labor. 8    "Employee" has the same application and meaning as that 9provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 10Collection Act. 11    "Employer" has the same application and meaning as that 12provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 13Collection Act. 14    Section 10. Employee protections. 15    (a) An employer shall provide a suitable seat to an 16employee when the nature of the employee's work reasonably 17allows for seated work. 18    (b) On and after the effective date of this Act, an 19employer shall not design a work space to require standing if 20the work space could reasonably be designed to allow seated 21work.   HB3249- 2 -LRB104 11020 SPS 21102 b1    Section 15. Notice. Within 30 days after the effective 2date of this Act, an employer shall post and keep posted a 3notice of employee rights under this Act where employee 4notices are customarily placed. 5    Section 20. Right of action. An aggrieved employee may 6bring a civil action to enforce any provision of this Act no 7later than one year after the date of the alleged violation. A 8civil action may be brought by one or more employees for and on 9behalf of themselves and other employees similarly situated. 10The court may award a prevailing employee all appropriate 11relief, including injunctive relief, reinstatement to the 12employee's former position or an equivalent position, back 13pay, reestablishment of any employee benefits, including 14seniority, to which the employee would otherwise have been 15eligible if the violation had not occurred, and any other 16appropriate relief as deemed necessary by the court to make 17the employee whole. The court shall award a prevailing 18employee reasonable attorney's fees and costs. 19    Section 25. Violations and civil penalties. The Department 20shall inquire into any alleged violations of this Act and 21enforce the provisions of this Act. An employer shall be 22assessed a civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation of this 23Act, payable to the Department. Each employee who is subject 24to a violation of this Act shall constitute a separate   HB3249- 3 -LRB104 11020 SPS 21102 b1violation.